Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 21
OFFENDER-BASED TRACKING SYSTEM

Section

16-21-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the creation of an offender-based tracking system is necessary in order to improve the consistency of data shared by the different elements of the criminal justice system and to allow for the tracking of offenders through the criminal justice system. The general assembly further finds and declares that the offender-based tracking system should be operated through the Colorado integrated criminal justice information system program.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article added, p. 647, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 87, § 5, effective March 25.

16-21-102. "Offender" defined.

Except as otherwise provided in section 16-21-103, for the purposes of this article, "offender" means any person charged as an adult with a felony, a class 1 misdemeanor, or a misdemeanor pursuant to section 42-4-1301, C.R.S., or a crime, the underlying factual basis of which included an act of domestic violence, as defined in section 18-6-800.3 (1), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article added, p. 647, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2039, § 19, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 2551, § 39, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section in House Bill 94-1253 and Senate Bill 94-1 were harmonized.

16-21-103. Information on offenders required - duties of law enforcement agencies - court.

For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Act of domestic violence" has the same meaning as set forth in section 18-6-800.3 (1), C.R.S.

"Arrest number" means a number that shall be assigned by the arresting agency to an arrest of the arrestee.

"Bureau" means the Colorado bureau of investigation.

(III.3) "CICJIS" means the Colorado integrated criminal justice information system program, as defined in section 16-20.5-102.

(III.5) "Electronic signature" means information transferred from one agency to another through CICJIS, including but not limited to warrants, mittimuses, judgments, and plea agreements.

(III.7) "ICON" means the integrated Colorado online network, as defined in section 16-20.5-102.

"Sexual offense" means crimes described in article 3 of title 18, C.R.S., and crimes described in articles 6 and 7 of title 18, C.R.S.

"State identification number" means the number assigned to an offender by the bureau based on fingerprint identification.

The requirements of this section are intended to complement the rules of criminal procedure and shall not be interpreted to conflict with or supersede any such rules.

A law enforcement agency that requests the filing of any criminal case shall submit to the district attorney the arresting agency's name, the offender's full name and date of birth, the charge or charges being requested, the investigating agency's case number, and the date of arrest and the arrest number. In addition, the law enforcement agency shall submit to the district attorney any relevant information about the offender's affiliation or association with gangs or gang activities.

In addition to the information described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), a law enforcement agency shall comply with the following procedures:

When requesting the filing of any felony, misdemeanor, or petty offense, criminal charge, or a violation of a municipal ordinance, the factual basis of which includes an act of domestic violence or a sexual offense, the law enforcement agency shall submit to the prosecuting attorney the information set forth in this subsection (2).

If a law enforcement agency directly issues a complaint, summons, or summons and complaint for the charges described in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), the agency shall identify on the face of such document whether the factual basis for the charge or charges includes an act of domestic violence or a sexual offense.

A district attorney who files any criminal case with the court or who reports to the bureau a final disposition occurring in the district attorney's office shall submit the arresting agency's name, the offender's full name and date of birth, the investigating agency's case number, the date of arrest and the arrest number, and any other information that a law enforcement agency is required to submit in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

Upon the issuance of a warrant of arrest, the court shall notify the sheriff of the county in which the court is located of the issuance of such warrant. When the court withdraws, cancels, quashes, or otherwise renders a warrant of arrest invalid, the court shall immediately notify the bureau of such action in a manner that is consistent with procedures established jointly by the state court administrator and the director of the bureau.

When the court creates a new criminal case in ICON, the court shall electronically notify the bureau of such action and shall provide the bureau with the arresting agency's name, the arrest date, and the arrest number provided to the court in accordance with subsection (3) of this section. Thereafter, the bureau shall electronically notify the court of the state identification number, if any, assigned to the offender.

The court shall report the final disposition concerning an offender to the bureau in a form that is electronically consistent with applicable law. The report shall be made within seventy-two hours after the final disposition; except that the time period shall not include Saturdays, Sundays, or legal holidays. The report shall include the information provided to the court in accordance with subsection (3) of this section, the disposition of each charge, and the court case number, and, with respect to any charge, the factual basis of which includes an act of domestic violence or a sexual offense, the court and the bureau shall comply with the following procedures:

The court shall advise the bureau to reflect the change of the status of domestic violence or sexual offense if the defendant is found not guilty of the alleged crime or if the case is dismissed.

The court shall specify that there is a change in the status of the charge originally submitted to the bureau in accordance with paragraph (b) of this subsection (4), based upon the court's findings.

The bureau shall reflect the change of status but shall not delete or eliminate information concerning the original charge.

The bureau shall maintain the information it receives pursuant to this article and shall make such information immediately available electronically to the department of corrections and to any other criminal justice agency upon request.

Upon receipt of the fingerprints required pursuant to this article, the bureau shall perform a complete search of the bureau's files to identify any prior criminal record that the offender may have. Upon the association of a unique state identification number with any such offender, the bureau shall report such number electronically to CICJIS, the submitting agency, and the district attorney with jurisdiction over the offense. Upon nonassociation, the bureau shall create a new state identification number and electronically report the number to CICJIS and the submitting agency. Upon receipt of the number, CICJIS shall electronically report the number to the court and the district attorney with jurisdiction over the offense.

The information received by the bureau pursuant to this article shall be made available to any sentencing court, probation office, or other pretrial services agency preparing a report on domestic violence or sexual offense cases.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article added, p. 647, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 874, § 6, effective June 5.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 256, § 2, effective June 3.

L. 94:

(1) and (3) amended and (6) added, p. 2039, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(3) and (6) amended, p. 600, § 2, effective May 22; entire section R&RE, p. 945, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1)(a)(III.3), (1)(a)(III.5), and (1)(a)(III.7) added and (4)(b), (5)(a), (5)(b), and (6) amended, p. 87, §§ 6, 7, effective March 25.

Editor's note:

Subsections (3) and (6) were amended in House Bill 95-1101. Those amendments were superseded by the repeal and reenactment of the section in Senate Bill 95-153.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1995 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 198, Session Laws of Colorado 1995.

16-21-104. Fingerprinting - ordered by court.

If the offender has not been fingerprinted and photographed for the charges pending before the court, the court at the first appearance of the offender after the filing of charges shall order the offender to report to the investigating agency within fourteen days for fingerprinting and photographing. The investigating agency shall endorse upon a copy of the order the completion of the fingerprinting and photographing and return the same to the court. At least one set of fingerprints and one set of photographs ordered pursuant to this section shall be forwarded by the investigating agency to the Colorado bureau of investigation in a form and manner prescribed by such bureau.

Any fingerprints required by this section to be forwarded shall be forwarded within twenty-four hours after completion; except that such time period shall not include Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article added, p. 648, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 442, § 10, effective May 29.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 257, § 3, effective June 3.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 861, § 99, effective July 1.

16-21-104.5. Electronic signatures - validity.

The information contained in an electronic signature, as defined in section 16-21-103 (1)(a)(III.5), sent between agencies using CICJIS, as defined in section 16-20.5-102, shall be presumed to be valid on its face without signed hard copy.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added p. 88, § 8, effective March 25.

16-21-105. Applicability of article to municipal courts - local law enforcement.

The provisions of this article concerning the duty of a law enforcement agency to identify on the face of a complaint, summons, or summons and complaint whether the factual basis of the charge or charges being filed include an act of domestic violence shall apply to local law enforcement agencies.

The provisions of this article concerning the duty of a court to notify the bureau concerning actions involving crimes in which the charge or charges include an act of domestic violence shall apply to municipal courts.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 2040, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 600, § 3, effective May 22.